New York, session 2025-2026, S3840.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Prohibit the sale of single use plastic water bottles in state 4 parks managed by the office. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 6 it shall have become a law and shall apply to all contracts entered 7 into, renewed or modified on and after the effective date of this act. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07361-01-5